Utah statutes.
75-3-915.   Distribution to person under disability.

A personal representative may discharge his obligation to distribute to any person under legal disability by distributing to his conservator, or any other person authorized by this code or otherwise to give a valid receipt and discharge for the distribution.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

